Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5297.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 13J of Chapter 255 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the following words:- 
“and, unless the debtor consents to an entry, at the time of such entry, without entry upon 
property owned by, or rented to the debtor”